New Mexico, session 2026, HB245.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 22-1-4 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1975, Chapter 338, Section 1, as amended) is amended to read: "22-1-4. FREE PUBLIC SCHOOLS--EXCEPTIONS--WITHDRAWING AND ENROLLING--OPEN ENROLLMENT.-- A. Except as provided by Section 24-5-2 NMSA 1978, and except as provided in Subsection [H] J of this section, a free public school education shall be available to any school-age person who is a resident of this state and has not received a high school diploma or its equivalent. B. A free public school education in those courses already offered to persons pursuant to the provisions of Subsection A of this section shall be available to any person who is a resident of this state and has received a high school diploma or its equivalent if there is available space in such courses. C. A person entitled to a free public school education pursuant to the provisions of this section may enroll or re-enroll in a public school at any time and, unless required to attend school pursuant to the Attendance for Success Act, may withdraw from a public school at any time. A public school shall not deny enrollment to a school-age person on the basis of race, ethnicity, sex, religion, disability, socioeconomic status or residential address. D. In adopting and promulgating rules concerning the enrollment of students transferring from a home school or private school to the public schools, the local school board shall provide that the grade level at which the transferring student is placed is appropriate to the age of the student or to the student's score on a student achievement test administered according to the statewide assessment and accountability system. E. A local school board shall adopt and promulgate rules [governing] allowing enrollment and re-enrollment of any student at any public [schools] school, other than a charter [schools] school, within the school district. These rules shall include: (1) definition of the school district boundary and the boundaries of attendance areas for each public school; (2) for each public school, definition of the boundaries of areas outside the school district boundary or within the school district but outside the public school's attendance area and within a distance of the public school that would not be served by a school bus route as determined pursuant to Section 22-16-4 NMSA 1978 if enrolled, which areas shall be designated as "walk zones"; (3) priorities for enrollment of students as follows: (a) first, students residing within the school district, or who will be residing within the school district if the student is a child in a military family who will be attending public school in the school district during the upcoming school year as provided in Subsection [H] J of this section, and within the attendance area of a public school and students who had resided in the attendance area prior to a parent who is an active duty member of the armed forces of the United States or member of the national guard being deployed and whose deployment has required the student to relocate outside the attendance area for custodial care; (b) second, students who previously attended the public school or are the children of a military family living in temporary housing and are assigned, awaiting placement or pending a move to permanent housing in a different attendance area where the students' family seeks enrollment of the students in either their current school attendance area or the school attendance area of the permanent housing; and (c) third, all other applicants; (4) establishment of maximum allowable class size if smaller than that permitted by law; and (5) rules pertaining to grounds for denial of enrollment or re-enrollment at schools within the school district [and the school district's hearing and appeals process for such a denial]. Grounds for denial of enrollment or re-enrollment shall be limited to: (a) a student's expulsion from any school district or private school in this state or any other state during the preceding twelve months; or (b) a student's behavior in another school district or private school in this state or any other state during the preceding twelve months that is detrimental to the welfare or safety of other students or school employees. F. A student's parent who is aggrieved by a public school's denial of enrollment to the student may appeal the denial to the secretary. If a transfer application has not been acted upon by a local school board within thirty days of receiving the application, the transfer shall be deemed approved for enrollment. The department shall promulgate rules for the process to appeal a denial; provided that: (1) only a school's lack of capacity or the grounds for denial set forth in Paragraph (5) of Subsection E of this section may support a denial of enrollment; and (2) the secretary's decision on an appeal shall be made within a reasonable time, shall be in writing and shall be a final decision on the matter. [F.] G. In adopting and promulgating rules governing enrollment and re-enrollment at public schools other than charter schools within the school district, a local school board may establish additional enrollment preferences for rules admitting students [in accordance with the second and third priorities of enrollment set forth in Subparagraphs (b) and (c) of Paragraph (3) of Subsection E of this section]. The additional enrollment preferences may include: [(1) after-school child care for students; (2) child care for siblings of students attending the public school; (3)] (1) children of employees employed at the public school; and [(4) extreme hardship; (5) location of a student's previous school; (6)] (2) siblings of students already attending the public school [and (7) student safety]. [G.] H. As long as the maximum allowable class size established by law or by rule of a local school board, whichever is lower, is not met or exceeded in a public school, [by enrollment of first- and second-priority persons] the public school shall enroll other persons applying [in the priorities stated in the school district rules adopted pursuant to Subsections E and F of this section] on a first-come, first- served basis. If the maximum would be exceeded by enrollment of [an applicant in the second and third priorities] all applicants, the public school shall establish a waiting list. As classroom space becomes available, persons highest on the waiting list [within the highest priority on the list] shall be notified and given the opportunity to enroll. I. A local school board shall determine the capacity of each public school in the local school board's district by grade level; provided that this requirement shall not apply to specialized programs. A public school shall post the number of vacancies for each grade level on the school's website at least once every twelve weeks. If a public school has capacity, the school shall enroll students throughout the school year. [H.] J. Every school district and charter school shall allow military families that will be relocating to a military installation in New Mexico pursuant to an official military order to enroll their children in public school prior to their actual physical presence in the school district. A parent may submit the student's name for any lottery-selected charter school, magnet school or other public school program for which the student qualifies. The school district or charter school shall accept electronic applications for enrollment, including enrollment in a specific school or program with the school district or charter school. The school district or charter school shall provide the applicant with materials regarding academic courses, electives, sports and other relevant information regarding the public school in which the student wants to be enrolled. The public school shall preregister the student in anticipation of the student's enrollment. A student's parent: (1) shall provide proof of residence in the school district within forty-five days after the published arrival date provided on official military documentation; and (2) may use any of the following addresses related to the family's military move: (a) a temporary on-base billeting facility; (b) off-base military housing; or (c) a purchased or leased residence. K. A local school board shall report annually to the department on the enrollment data for each public school in the local school board's district, including transfer applications, acceptances, denials, the reason for each denial and the number of resident students who transferred to a school outside of the student's attendance area. The department shall publish the data from these reports annually on the department's website." - 8 -